District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

45-607

“Insane person” and “lunatic”.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 23(a), 59 DCR 5567

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 49-207.
1973 Ed., § 49-207.

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.